Missouri, session 2026, HB10.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein, for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
PART 1
Section 10.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 2
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department of Mental
Health and the Department of Health and Senior Services in
implementing the appropriations found in Part 1 and Part 2 of this
act. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of a
one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed
to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the stated
appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified
as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to
any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 10.005. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ................................................................................................$630,333
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................22,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,783
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................673,116
Personal Service ..................................................................................................105,698
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 53,805
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 159,503
Total (Not to exceed 7.82 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$832,619
Section 10.010. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 3
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,401,586
Section 10.015. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For contracted staffing for: Fulton State Hospital, Northwest Missouri
Psychiatric Rehabilitation Center, the Forensic Treatment Center,
Hawthorn Children’s Psychiatric Hospital, Higginsville
Habilitation Center, Northwest Community Services, and
Southeast Missouri Residential Services
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (one-time) .....................$26,979,316
Section 10.020. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,518,909
Expense and Equipment (including $700,000 one-time) ......................... 1,060,560
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,579,469
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,317,826
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 794,441
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................2,112,267
To procure and implement a multi-year, vendor-hosted,
integrated commercial off the shelf electronic health record
system for use in all of the department’s hospitals and facilities
Personal Service ..................................................................................................648,233
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,490,054
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 4,138,287
Total (Not to exceed 126.55 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,830,023
Section 10.025. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For staff training, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed from
personal service to expense and equipment and three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 4
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$659,140
Personal Service ..................................................................................................231,677
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 290,481
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................522,158
For the Caring for Missourians' Mental Health Initiative
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 551,705
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,733,003
Section 10.030. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For Employee Support Resources
For support services to DMH state operated facilities and office staff
Personal Service ................................................................................................$396,636
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,269,650
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (Not to exceed
5.00 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................................$1,666,286
Section 10.035. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For funding insurance, private pay, licensure fee, and/or Medicaid
refunds by state facilities operated by the Department of Mental
Health
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$205,000
For refunds
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................500,000
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ......................................................100
From Mental Health Intergovernmental Transfer Fund (1147) .............................................100
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249) .............................................................................100
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) .....................................................................................100
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) ......................................................................50,000
From Habilitation Center Room and Board Fund (1435) .................................................10,000
From Inmate Fund (1540) ......................................................................................................100
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926) ............................................................................25,000
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ...............................................................150,000
For the transfer payment of refunds set off against debts as required by
Section 143.786, RSMo

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 5
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 25,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$965,500
Section 10.040. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Mental
Health Trust Fund
From Abandoned Fund Account (1863) .......................................................................$150,000
Section 10.045. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For receipt and disbursement of donations and gifts which may become
available to the Department of Mental Health during the year
(excluding federal grants and funds)
Personal Service ................................................................................................$587,347
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,925,000
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926) (Not to exceed 7.50 F.T.E.) ........................$2,512,347
Section 10.050. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General Assembly
provided the General Assembly shall be notified of the source of
any new funds and the purpose for which they shall be expended,
in writing, prior to the use of said funds
Personal Service ................................................................................................$156,157
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,462,390
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (Not to exceed
2.00 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................................$2,618,547
Section 10.055. To the Department of Mental Health
For Medicaid payments related to intergovernmental payments
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................$11,900,000
From Mental Health Intergovernmental Transfer Fund (1147) ........................... 6,600,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,500,000
Section 10.060. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 6
for providing the state match for the Department of Mental
Health payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$399,487,368
Section 10.065. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund to provide the state match for the
Department of Mental Health payments
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .....................................$373,623,656
Section 10.070. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund for Disproportionate Share Hospital
funds leveraged by the Department of Mental Health – Institution
of Mental Disease facilities
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................$50,000,000
Section 10.090. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program
Federal Fund (1159) (one-time) ...................................................................$10,000,000
Section 10.094. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For grant funding for the Crisis Counseling Program to provide services
related to presidential disaster declarations
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$67,945
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,090,000
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)
(Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E).............................................................................$2,157,945
Section 10.095. To the Department of Mental Health
For an Outpatient Comprehensive Substance Treatment and
Rehabilitation (CSTAR) Provider, located in any city not within
a county, with at least twenty years of experience and currently
in the process of renovating clinics, to meet increasing substance
use needs in the community through clinic and recovery housing
renovations and expanded telehealth access
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$750,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 7
Section 10.096. To the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design, construction, expansion, and operation of a
children’s behavioral health hospital and outpatient treatment
center of a hospital founded in 1879, and located in any city with
more than twenty-three thousand but fewer than twenty-seven
thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more than one
million inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$10,000,000
Section 10.100. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the administration of statewide comprehensive psychiatric services
and alcohol and drug abuse prevention and treatment programs,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,928,666
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 80,657
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,009,323
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,693,360
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,885,784
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................3,579,144
Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 65,684
Total (Not to exceed 59.92 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,654,151
Section 10.105. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For prevention and education services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................$17,854,737
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245) ...................................................1,500,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................82,148
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) ....................................................................475,024
From Department of Mental Health Federal Stimulus - 2021 Fund
(2455) ..................................................................................................................799,634
Personal Service ..................................................................................................122,690
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,372,959

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 8
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,495,649
Personal Service ..................................................................................................166,586
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 285,607
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................452,193
For enabling enforcement of the provisions of the Family Smoking
Prevention and Tobacco Control Act of 2009 in collaboration
with the Department of Public Safety, Division of Alcohol and
Tobacco Control
Personal Service ..................................................................................................342,077
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 201,159
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................543,236
For suicide prevention initiatives
Personal Service ....................................................................................................24,048
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 829,806
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................853,854
For distribution to a non-profit located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, founded in 1982 to prevent and treat opioid substance use
by detoxification, temporary housing, treatment programs for
sobriety, and fentanyl epidemic recovery, provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) (one-time) ................2,510,730
For distribution to a fire department located in a city with more than one
hundred five thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty-five
thousand inhabitants that engages in partnerships between social
work resources, mental health resources, and emergency
responders to connect community members to essential services
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................1,000,000
For community grants to local governments impacted by the opioid
epidemic
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 6,900,000
Total (Not to exceed 8.84 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$34,467,205
Section 10.106. To the Department of Mental Health

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 9
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For grants no less than $250,000 distributed to Prevention Resource
Centers for primary care substance-use prevention
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,000,000
Section 10.107. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Opioid Settlement Administration
For the reporting requirements pursuant to Section 196.1050, RSMo.
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$79,737
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)
(Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$84,737
Section 10.109. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Recovery Community Centers
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,402,527
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 1,200,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,602,527
Section 10.110. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Recovery Support Services
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,835,879
For peer-to-peer substance use disorder and mental health recovery
support services, located in any city with more than one hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................100,000
For Recovery Support Services with the Access to Recovery Program
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 2,598,084
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,533,963
Section 10.111. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Addiction Medicine Fellowships
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,304,370

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 10
Section 10.112. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For an organization located in a county with more than forty thousand
but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than twenty-one thousand but fewer than thirty-one
thousand inhabitants, that empowers men with substance use
disorders through mentorship, education, counseling, and
vocational training, for the purpose of renovating facilities
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) (one-time) .................$200,000
Section 10.115. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$766,593
Personal Service ..................................................................................................275,338
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 377,058
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................652,396
Personal Service ..................................................................................................279,257
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,213
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................300,470
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections indicated in Sections
10.115 and 10.130 to allow flexibility in payment for the
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective
Payment System, and provided that Medicaid
CSTAR/CPR/CCBHO services shall not be capped and Medicaid
supplemental shall be requested when necessary, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................13,091,648
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................87,366,819
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................2,176,257
From Department of Mental Health Federal Stimulus - 2021 Fund (2455) ................2,970,141

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 11
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse
From Inmate Fund (1540) ............................................................................................3,513,779
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................6,074,976
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ...............................................................963,775
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) .................................................10,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................6,040,316
For reducing recidivism among offenders with serious substance use
disorders who are returning to community areas from any of the
state correctional facilities. Additionally, remaining funds shall
be used to support offenders returning to other regions of the state
who are working with available treatment slots from the
Department of Mental Health. The department shall select a
qualified not-for-profit service provider in accordance with state
purchasing rules. The provider must have experience serving this
population in a correctional setting as well as in the community.
The provider shall design and implement an evidence-based
program that includes a continuum of services from prison to
community, including medication assisted treatment that is
initiated prior to release, when appropriate. The program must
include an evaluation component to determine its effectiveness
relative to other options, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,564,144
For treatment of compulsive gambling
Expense and Equipment
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249) ......................................................................153,606
To the Missouri Credentialing Board to credential licensed
professionals and certified counselors in gambling addiction
support and to develop and maintain an evidence-based training
program and to create a peer gambling credentialing program
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249) ......................................................................200,000
For the Substance Abuse Traffic Offender Program
Expense and Equipment
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) .................................................................6,995,353

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 12
For a non-profit organization focused on veteran’s healthcare
headquartered in any city not within a county, working in
collaboration with an Outpatient Comprehensive Substance
Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR) Provider, for the
renovation of facilities to expand access to mental health and
employment training for veterans with opioid use disorder and
co-occurring substance use disorders
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................250,000
For statewide distribution of opioid antagonists approved by the Food
and Drug Administration, provided $100,000 be utilized for a
pilot project to distribute fentanyl test strips to community-based
organizations
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................5,100,000
For statewide distribution of opioid antagonists approved by the Food
and Drug Administration to law enforcement agencies and first
responders
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) (one-time) ................8,000,000
For comprehensive psychiatric services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,574,946
Expense and Equipment (including $3,857,560 one-time) ...................... 23,200,410
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................24,775,356
Personal Service ..................................................................................................494,474
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 4,548,307
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................5,042,781
For adult psychiatric services, provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility
is allowed between subsections indicated in Sections 10.115 and
10.130 to allow flexibility in payment for the Certified
Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective Payment
System, and provided that Medicaid CSTAR/CPR/CCBHO
services shall not be capped and Medicaid supplemental shall be
requested when necessary, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 13
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................31,881,920
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................53,653,579
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ..................................................................................................................850,196
100 From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ............................................1,310,572
101 From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245) ......................................................500,000
102 From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ............................................................2,426,903
103 From Department of Mental Health Federal Stimulus - 2021 Fund
104 (2455) ...............................................................................................................3,969,012
105 For housing assistance for homeless veterans, provided three percent
106 (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
107 Expense and Equipment
108 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................255,000
109 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................1,000,000
110 For Housing Liaisons to provide Missourians with disabilities assistance
111 in securing housing and receiving supportive services and to
112 serve as liaisons between tenants, housing providers, and the
113 department
114 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,500,000
115 From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................2,500,000
116 For Shelter Plus Care grants
117 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................14,336,746
118 Funding for a non-profit health care organization that provides a
119 full continuum of behavioral health services as well as primary
120 and dental health services throughout Missouri
121 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,000,000
122 For youth psychiatric services, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is
123 allowed between subsections indicated in Sections 10.115 and
124 10.130 to allow flexibility in payment for the Certified
125 Community Behavioral Health Clinic Prospective Payment
126 System, and provided that Medicaid CSTAR/CPR/CCBHO
127 services shall not be capped and Medicaid supplemental shall be
128 requested when necessary, and further provided three percent
129 (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
130 Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 14
131 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,895,742
132 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................6,923,542
133 From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ...............................................600,000
134 From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ............................................................1,406,879
135 For Federally Qualified Health Centers, located in any city with more
136 than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
137 one county, and in any city with more than one hundred sixty
138 thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, to
139 provide mental health services
140 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................600,000
141 To provide funding for ambulance services and Emergency
142 Medical Response Agencies to provide transportation of
143 behavioral health patients directly to behavioral health services,
144 as well as providing treatment of behavioral health patients with
145 proper referral to behavioral health services
146 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,000,000
147 For the Division of Behavioral Health to implement the use of EEG-
148 Guided Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation (e-TMS) equipment
149 for priority populations to include veterans, law enforcement and
150 first responders
151 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,000,000
152 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................2,117,298
153 From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................2,000,000
154 For services at a youth resiliency campus located in any county with
155 more than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three
156 hundred thousand inhabitants
157 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................850,000
158 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................1,000,000
159 For an organization serving a city not within a county and the
160 surrounding region to support prevention of opioid overdose
161 From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)
162 (including $556,500 one-time)................................................................ 1,113,000
163 Total (Not to exceed 50.52 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$324,698,799
Section 10.119. To the Department of Mental Health

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 15
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the MOConnect System
For the maintenance and operation of the crisis module
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$498,750
For the maintenance and operation of the referral module
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................. 498,750
Total ..............................................................................................................................$997,500
Section 10.120. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For reimbursing attorneys, physicians, and counties for fees in
involuntary civil commitment procedures, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,797,441
Section 10.121. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For Forensic Mobile Teams to provide treatment to clients who are in
county jails awaiting court-ordered evaluations pursuant to
Chapter 552 RSMo and those who have been court-ordered for
competency restoration services in a Division of Behavioral
Health (DBH) inpatient facility pursuant to Chapter 552 RSMo
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,669,255
Expense and Equipment (including $15,000 one-time) .......................... 405,333
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 18.50 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,074,588
Section 10.123. To the Department of Mental Health
For engaging patients in care coordination (EPICC) 24/7 referral and
linkage service for those residing in targeted regions, primarily
for individuals post overdose, but who also may present to
hospitals with issues relating to opioid, stimulant, and/or alcohol
use disorders to establish immediate connections to recovery
support services, and substance use treatment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$500,000
Section 10.125. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 16
For prevention, treatment, and recovery programs at recovery high
schools
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................$6,834,783
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 3,600,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,434,783
Section 10.126. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For repair and renovation of an organization that provides transitional
living and supportive housing for individuals in recovery from
alcohol and drugs, located in any county with more than fifty
thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than seventeen thousand but fewer than
twenty-one thousand inhabitants, and located in any county with
more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twenty-one
thousand but fewer than thirty-one thousand inhabitants
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) (one-time) .................$980,000
Section 10.128. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the reimbursement of hospitals related to individuals who qualify for
placement and support through the Division of Behavioral Health
who may otherwise be eligible for discharge but cannot be
discharged due to a lack of availability within an appropriate
community placement. Such hospitals shall provide a request for
funding documenting these individuals, length of stay beyond
discharge, and effort to find placement. The division shall on a
pro-rata basis provide a per diem reimbursement on an annual
basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 10.129. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the renovation of two inpatient psychiatric units at an outpatient
children’s clinic, which helps children who are demonstrating
dysfunctional behavior or symptoms of mental illness, located in
any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 17
located in more than one county, provided that local matching
funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,647,000
Section 10.130. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse for payment of services to
Certified Community Behavioral Health Organizations, provided
twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between subsections
indicated in Sections 10.115 and 10.130 to allow flexibility in
payment for the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic
Prospective Payment System, and provided that Medicaid
CSTAR/CPR/CCBHO services shall not be capped and Medicaid
supplemental shall be requested when necessary, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$35,373,965
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................30,753,012
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ..................................................................................................................316,457
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245) ...................................................2,000,000
For adult psychiatric services and community programs, provided twenty
percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between subsections
indicated in Sections 10.115 and 10.130 to allow flexibility in
payment for the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic
Prospective Payment System, and provided that Medicaid
CSTAR/CPR/CCBHO services shall not be capped and Medicaid
supplemental shall be requested when necessary, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................193,752,996
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................302,354,442
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) .............................................................................................................14,144,319
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................189,799

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 18
For matching funds to a Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organization, operating in any city with more than one hundred
five thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty-five thousand
inhabitants, to establish a substance use treatment facility in any
county with more than seven hundred thousand but fewer than
eight hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................3,500,000
For youth psychiatric services and community programs, provided
twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between subsections
indicated in Sections 10.115 and 10.130 to allow flexibility in
payment for the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic
Prospective Payment System, and provided that Medicaid
CSTAR/CPR/CCBHO services for youth shall not be capped and
Medicaid supplemental shall be requested when necessary, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.575
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................82,416,256
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................139,787,074
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ....................................................................................................... 36,827,613
Total .......................................................................................................................$841,415,933
Section 10.135. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For a universal screening program used to identify maternal depression
and related behavioral health disorders including anxiety,
substance use disorder and depression
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ............................................$750,000
Section 10.139. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the 988 Crisis Response
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................$3,140,197
Section 10.140. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For administrative expenses related to the 988 Crisis Response

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 19
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$36,395
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,000
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................$41,395
Section 10.145. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For a substance abuse initiative that focuses on providing medication
assisted treatment to treat substance use disorders. Eligible
Federally Qualified Health Centers shall have provided walk-in
medication assisted treatment services in the previous year
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,000,000
Section 10.150. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
To pay the state operated hospital provider tax
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,510,000
For funding expenses related to fluctuating census demands, Medicare
bundling compliance, Medicare Part D implementation, and to
restore facilities personal service and/or expense and equipment
incurred for direct care worker training and other operational
maintenance expenses
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................4,438,909
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal
Fund (1159) .............................................................................................. 400,184
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,349,093
Section 10.300. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Fulton State Hospital, provided fifteen percent (15%) may be
spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
facilities, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between Fulton State Hospital and Fulton State Hospital
Sexual Offender Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program,
and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and further

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 20
provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Sections 10.305, 10.310, 10.315, 10.320, and 10.325,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$56,722,455
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,152,658
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................68,875,113
Personal Service ..................................................................................................998,482
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 618,895
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................1,617,377
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................848,945
For the Fulton State Hospital Sexual Offender Rehabilitation and
Treatment Services Program, provided fifteen percent (15%) may
be spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
facilities, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between Fulton State Hospital Sexual Offender
Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program and Fulton State
Hospital, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Sections 10.305, 10.310, 10.315, 10.320, and
10.325, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................13,457,724
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,737,527
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................16,195,251
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 21
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 79,699
Total (Not to exceed 1,293.07 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$87,616,385
Section 10.305. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Northwest Missouri Psychiatric Rehabilitation Center, provided
fifteen percent (15%) may be spent on the Purchase of
Community Services, including transitioning clients to the
community or other state-operated facilities, and further provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and further provided five percent
(5%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Sections 10.300,
10.310, 10.315, 10.320, and 10.325, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$14,968,415
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,109,261
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................19,077,676
Personal Service ..................................................................................................828,990
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 105,903
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................934,893
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................221,116
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 11,880
Total (Not to exceed 288.73 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$20,245,565
Section 10.310. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Forensic Treatment Center, provided fifteen percent (15%) may
be spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 22
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
facilities, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Sections 10.300, 10.305, 10.315, 10.320, and
10.325, and provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$37,156,783
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,709,557
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................45,866,340
Personal Service ..................................................................................................903,776
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 93,210
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................996,986
Personal Service ..................................................................................................121,153
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 855,546
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) ....................................................................976,699
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................396,532
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 2,191
Total (Not to exceed 707.41 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$48,238,748
Section 10.315. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center, provided fifteen
percent (15%) may be spent on the Purchase of Community
Services, including transitioning clients to the community or
other state-operated facilities, and provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between Southeast Missouri Mental Health
Center and Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center-Sexual
Offender Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program, and
further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 23
provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Sections 10.300, 10.305, 10.310, 10.320, and 10.325,
and provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$26,748,143
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,080,007
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................32,828,150
Personal Service ..................................................................................................307,474
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 219,538
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................527,012
Personal Service
From Mental Health Trust Fund (1926) ............................................................................97,876
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................211,667
For the Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center-Sexual Offender
Rehabilitation and Treatment Services Program, provided fifteen
percent (15%) may be spent on the Purchase of Community
Services, including transitioning clients to the community or
other state-operated facilities, and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between Southeast Missouri Mental
Health Center-Sexual Offender Rehabilitation and Treatment
Services Program and Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center,
and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Sections 10.300, 10.305, 10.310, 10.320, and 10.325,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................25,580,938
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,405,648
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................30,986,586

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 24
Personal Service
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................................32,839
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 110,104
Total (Not to exceed 980.62 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$64,794,234
Section 10.320. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Center for Behavioral Medicine, provided fifteen percent (15%)
may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
facilities, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Sections 10.300, 10.305, 10.310, 10.315, and
10.325, and provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$18,281,996
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,073,767
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................21,355,763
Personal Service ..................................................................................................254,490
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 633,697
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................888,187
Expense and Equipment
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) ....................................................................416,100
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 319,756

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 25
Total (Not to exceed 307.99 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$22,979,806
Section 10.325. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Hawthorn Children's Psychiatric Hospital, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Sections 10.300, 10.305,
10.310, 10.315, and 10.320, and provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,405,934
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,203,685
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................11,609,619
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,958,287
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 197,901
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................2,156,188
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................85,861
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 7,629
Total (Not to exceed 224.64 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,859,297
Section 10.400. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the division administration, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,883,186
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 59,890
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,943,076
Personal Service ..................................................................................................495,798
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 868,980
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 1,364,778
Total (Not to exceed 30.12 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,307,854

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 26
Section 10.405. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
To pay the state operated Intermediate Care Facilities for
Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities (ICF/ID) provider tax
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,200,000
For habilitation centers
Expense and Equipment
From Habilitation Center Room and Board Fund (1435) .................................... 3,417,038
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,617,038
Section 10.410. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
Provided residential services for non-Medicaid eligibles shall not
be reduced below the prior year expenditures as long as the
person is evaluated to need the services
For community programs, including long-term care transformation
initiatives and efforts for reimbursement of providers based on
integration of key identified outcomes that produce value-based
care delivery models to improve quality and efficiency of the
total care delivered to individuals
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$947,146,107
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ....................................1,678,419,381
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................5,805,552
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) ............................................................1,015,000
For community programs, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,048,001
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 36,800
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,084,801
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,137,569
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 179,284
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................1,316,853
For statewide autism outreach, education, and awareness programs for
persons with autism and their families

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 27
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................13,131,599
For an Autism Center located in a city with more than fifty-one thousand
but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and located in
more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................51,511
For Autism Outreach Initiatives for Children in Northeast Missouri
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................51,511
For Regional Autism projects
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,000,000 one-time) ....................10,017,135
For an Autism Center headquartered in a city with more than one hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For the Developmental Disability Training Program in a county with
more than four hundred thousand but fewer than five hundred
thousand inhabitants and a county with more than one million
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................250,000
For services for children who are clients of the Department of Social
Services
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ..........................................11,591,223
For youth services
From Mental Health Interagency Payments Fund (1109) ...............................................213,832
For Senate Bill 40 Board Tax Funds to be used as match for Medicaid
initiatives for clients of the division
From DMH Local Tax Matching Fund (1930) .................................................... 5,889,538
Total (Not to exceed 26.59 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$2,676,984,043
Section 10.415. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 28
For a designated provider (including a provider that operates in
coordination with a team of health care professionals) or a health
team selected by an eligible individual with chronic conditions to
provide health home services, designed to coordinate care for
individuals with identified health risks and chronic health
conditions receiving DD HCBS services, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,100,667
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 9,906,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,006,667
Section 10.420. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the reimbursement of hospitals related to individuals who qualify for
placement and support through the Division of Developmental
Disabilities who may otherwise be eligible for discharge but
cannot be discharged due to a lack of availability within an
appropriate community placement. Such hospitals shall provide
a request for funding documenting these individuals, length of
stay beyond discharge, and effort to find placement. The division
shall on a pro-rata basis provide a per diem reimbursement on an
annual basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $4,700,000 one-time) ....................$8,700,000
Section 10.425. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For community support staff, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,490,956
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 8,955,829
Total (Not to exceed 234.38 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,446,785
Section 10.430. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For developmental disabilities services, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$560,699

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 29
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,826,069
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (Not to exceed
7.98 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................................$2,386,768
Section 10.435. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to the
General Revenue Fund as a result of recovering the Intermediate
Care Facility Intellectually Disabled (ICF/ID) Reimbursement
Allowance Fund
From Intermediate Care Facility Intellectually Disabled Reimbursement
Allowance Fund (1901) .................................................................................$2,300,000
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to Federal
Funds
From Intermediate Care Facility Intellectually Disabled Reimbursement
Allowance Fund (1901) ........................................................................... 4,066,456
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,366,456
Section 10.500. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Central Missouri Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,641,321
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 179,911
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,821,232
Personal Service ..................................................................................................723,014
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 111,063
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 834,077
Total (Not to exceed 98.70 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,655,309
Section 10.505. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Kansas City Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 30
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,409,346
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 254,178
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,663,524
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,369,119
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 111,945
From Federal Funds Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ........... 1,481,064
Total (Not to exceed 97.74 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,144,588
Section 10.510. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Sikeston Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,423,346
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 128,541
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,551,887
Personal Service ..................................................................................................267,298
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,735
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 295,033
Total (Not to exceed 48.57 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,846,920
Section 10.515. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Springfield Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,918,871
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 167,999
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,086,870
Personal Service ..................................................................................................423,301
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 41,508
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 464,809
Total (Not to exceed 60.13 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,551,679
Section 10.520. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 31
For the St. Louis Regional Center, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,710,914
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 392,295
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,103,209
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,190,148
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 246,273
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 1,436,421
Total (Not to exceed 141.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$8,539,630
Section 10.525. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Bellefontaine Habilitation Center, provided fifteen percent (15%)
may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
services, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,534,797
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 389,397
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,924,194
Personal Service .............................................................................................12,126,353
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 645,673
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................12,772,026
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,238,175
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 13,099
Total (Not to exceed 459.35 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$24,947,494
Section 10.530. To the Department of Mental Health

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 32
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For the Higginsville Habilitation Center, provided thirty percent (30%)
may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
services, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,301,906
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 151,147
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,453,053
Personal Service ...............................................................................................7,571,459
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 366,749
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................7,938,208
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................551,428
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 87,789
Total (Not to exceed 333.43 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$15,030,478
Section 10.535. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For Northwest Community Services, provided thirty percent (30%) may
be spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
services, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$12,064,808
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 523,277
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................12,588,085
Personal Service .............................................................................................14,679,254

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 33
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 618,733
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................15,297,987
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 965,004
Total (Not to exceed 609.46 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$28,851,076
Section 10.540. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For Southwest Community Services, provided fifteen percent (15%) may
be spent on the Purchase of Community Services, including
transitioning clients to the community or other state-operated
services, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,846,412
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 91,733
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,938,145
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,866,062
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 360,055
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................6,226,117
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................64,551
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 247,088
Total (Not to exceed 238.96 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$11,475,901
Section 10.545. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 34
For the St. Louis Developmental Disabilities Treatment Center, provided
thirty percent (30%) may be spent on the Purchase of Community
Services, including transitioning clients to the community or
other state-operated services, and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,584,759
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,973,611
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................12,558,370
Personal Service .............................................................................................13,548,834
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 718,822
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 14,267,656
Total (Not to exceed 504.74 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$26,826,026
Section 10.550. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For Southeast Missouri Residential Services, provided thirty percent
(30%) may be spent on the Purchase of Community Services,
including transitioning clients to the community or other state-
operated services, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.575
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,132,404
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 149,259
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,281,663
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,604,872
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 633,384
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................6,238,256
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................261,615

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 35
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 91,023
Total (Not to exceed 249.19 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$11,872,557
Section 10.555. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
To be distributed to programs promoting basic scientific research,
clinic patient research, and patient care for tuberous sclerosis
complex
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 10.575. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 10.600. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Office of the Director
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ................................................................................................$348,867
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................2,598
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,133
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................368,598
Personal Service ..................................................................................................608,137
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................17,385
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 67,048
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 692,570
Total (Not to exceed 11.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,061,168
Section 10.605. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,112,452
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 537,443

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 36
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,649,895
For program operations and support
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,629,358
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,982,510
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................5,611,868
Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ......................................................330,000
Expense and Equipment
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276) .....................................................................50,000
Expense and Equipment
From Mammography Fund (1293) ...................................................................................25,000
Personal Service ..................................................................................................353,200
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 199,900
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ......................................................553,100
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Services
Fund (1646) ...........................................................................................................44,571
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health - Donated Fund (1658) ........................................................30,000
Expense and Equipment
From Putative Father Registry Fund (1780) .....................................................................25,000
Expense and Equipment
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824) ........................................................................30,000
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,226,238
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,027,134
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .........................3,253,372
Personal Service ....................................................................................................32,301
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 79,479
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................111,780

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 37
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) ..................................... 1,020,524
Total (Not to exceed 101.35 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$12,735,110
Section 10.610. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to the Health
Access Incentive Fund
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ............................................................................$759,624
Section 10.615. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For the payment of refunds set off against debts in accordance with
Section 143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ..........................................................................$50,000
Section 10.620. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For refunds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$50,000
For refunds, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
federal and other funds
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .........................100,000
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ..........................................................9,240
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276) .......................................................................5,000
From Mammography Fund (1293) .....................................................................................1,000
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................................39,000
From Endowed Care Cemetery Audit Fund (1562) ............................................................2,899
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan
Repayment Fund (1565) .........................................................................................2,500
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) ..................................................51,000
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ............................100,000
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Services
Fund (1646) ...........................................................................................................10,000
From Department of Health - Donated Fund (1658) ........................................................15,133
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) .........................................................................333
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694) ..................................................................................13,495
From Brain Injury Fund (1742) .............................................................................................100
From Missouri State Coroners’ Training Fund (1846) .......................................................1,200

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 38
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824) ...............................................................................25
From Childhood Lead Testing Fund (1899) ........................................................ 275
Total ..............................................................................................................................$401,200
Section 10.625. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Administration
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General
Assembly, provided the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall
be expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
Personal Service ................................................................................................$130,765
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,000,001
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................3,130,766
Personal Service ..................................................................................................120,264
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 347,596
From Department of Health - Donated Fund (1658) ........................................... 467,860
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,598,626
Section 10.630. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, in
accordance with Section 135.690, RSMo, to the General Revenue
Fund
From Medical Preceptor Fund (1260) ...........................................................................$200,000
Section 10.700. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For cancer and chronic disease control, provided thirty percent (30%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 39
Personal Service ................................................................................................$446,923
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 196,605
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................643,528
Personal Service ..................................................................................................654,909
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,860,936
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................5,515,845
Personal Service ..................................................................................................153,179
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 131,887
From Organ Donor Program Fund (1824) ......................................................................285,066
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................26,241
For a grant program benefitting people living with amyotrophic lateral
sclerosis (ALS) and providing case services, including respite
care, care coordination, and clinical support
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................250,000
For Community Based Navigation Services for breast cancer screening
and treatment provided by a statewide community based not-for-
profit with experience supporting low to moderate income
individuals who are either in need of preventative screening
services for breast cancer detection and/or treatment for breast
cancer
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For the Show Me Healthy Women program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
Personal Service ..................................................................................................473,898
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,894,453
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,368,351
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................................20,000
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 40
From Department of Health – Donated Fund (1658)........................................... 32,548
Total (Not to exceed 21.60 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$10,141,579
Section 10.705. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For communicable disease control and prevention, provided thirty
percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between personal service in
Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740,
10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780,
and 10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility
is allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,220,501
Expense and Equipment (including $949,972 one-time) ......................... 2,086,982
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,307,483
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,575,665
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,512,961
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................4,088,626
Expense and Equipment
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) (including $1,737,894 one-time) ..........................................................3,547,792
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 121,787
Total (Not to exceed 40.56 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$11,065,688
Section 10.710. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For community health and wellness initiatives, provided thirty percent
(30%) flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 41
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided seventeen percent (17%) flexibility between
personal service and expense and equipment within the Health
Initiatives Fund (1275) within section 10.710, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ................................................................................................$308,448
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 60,198
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................368,646
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,030,405
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,607,136
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................7,637,541
Personal Service ....................................................................................................13,630
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,532,897
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................2,546,527
Personal Service ..................................................................................................168,855
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,506,500
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .........................2,675,355
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................216,300
Expense and Equipment
From Governor’s Council on Physical Fitness Institution Gift Trust
Fund (1924) ...........................................................................................................10,000
For the Adolescent Health Program
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................21,228
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,290,073
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..................................................................................1,228

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 42
For statewide distribution of opioid antagonists approved by the Food
and Drug Administration
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 800,000
Total (Not to exceed 22.16 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$16,566,898
Section 10.715. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For tobacco addiction prevention
From Healthy Families Trust Fund (1625) ................................................................$1,900,000
Section 10.720. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For tobacco cessation services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .........................100,000
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) ............................................................. 2,300,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,500,000
Section 10.725. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For Community and Public Health administration, provided thirty
percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between personal service in
Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740,
10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780,
and 10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility
is allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,801,442
For the expansion of medical training and support to healthcare
professionals and first responders with the use of point-of-care
ultrasound technology
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,870,000
Personal Service ..................................................................................................939,934
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,102,946

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 43
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,042,880
Personal Service ..................................................................................................238,602
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 333,830
From Department of Health – Donated Fund (1658)......................................................572,432
Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................1,338,536
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................... 59,000
Total (Not to exceed 68.40 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,684,290
Section 10.730. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For emergency preparedness and response, provided $1,000,000 be used
to assist in maintaining the Poison Control Hotline, and further
provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service in Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725,
10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765,
10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and further provided thirty
percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between expense and
equipment in Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730,
10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770,
10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ................................................................................................$320,922
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,200,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,520,922
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,302,169
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,635,701
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................13,937,870
Personal Service ....................................................................................................98,589
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 24,472
From Missouri Public Health Service Fund (1298) ........................................................123,061
Personal Service ....................................................................................................88,045

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 44
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 23,785
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ..............................................111,830
Expense and Equipment
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .........................................................................500,000
For the Department to enter into an agreement with an organization that
administers funds derived from 190.800 to establish a HIPAA-
compliant communication and patient logistics platform that
ensures the privacy and security of the patient information
available for all emergency service responders and providers to
use
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .........................................................................875,000
For outbreak response
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................... 300,000
Total (Not to exceed 36.76 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$17,368,683
Section 10.735. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For environmental public health, provided thirty percent (30%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,078,174
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 341,392
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,419,566
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,748,128
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,748,278
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................6,496,406
Personal Service ..................................................................................................361,920
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 560,400

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 45
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ..........................922,320
Personal Service ..................................................................................................467,430
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 73,984
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ......................................................541,414
Personal Service ..................................................................................................264,624
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 66,884
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................331,508
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Lead Abatement Loan Fund (1893) ...........................................................1,000
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 179,986
Total (Not to exceed 76.66 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$10,892,200
Section 10.740. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For genetics and newborn health services, provided thirty percent (30%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ................................................................................................$470,952
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 693,937
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,164,889
Personal Service ..................................................................................................710,043
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 803,284
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,513,327
Personal Service ..................................................................................................173,323
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,660,062
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ...................................................1,833,385

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 46
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................10,585
For the SAFE-CARE Program, including implementing a regionalized
medical response to child abuse, providing daily review of cases
of children less than four (4) years of age under investigation by
the Missouri Department of Social Services, Children's Division,
and to provide medical forensics training to medical providers
and multi-disciplinary team members
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 250,000
Total (Not to exceed 19.20 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,772,186
Section 10.741. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For grants for newborn safety incubators
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
Section 10.745. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For health informatics and epidemiology, provided thirty percent (30%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,319,570
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,480,925
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,652,545
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................5,133,470
Personal Service ....................................................................................................57,865
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,671

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 47
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199) ........................................63,536
Personal Service ....................................................................................................96,077
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 68,048
From Department of Health and Senior Services Document Service
Fund (1646) .........................................................................................................164,125
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................33,577
To the University of Missouri to support the Parkinson’s Disease
Registry in order to collect data on the incidence of Parkinson’s
disease in Missouri
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 300,000
Total (Not to exceed 55.16 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,014,278
Section 10.750. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For human immunodeficiency virus, sexually transmitted infection, and
Hepatitis services, provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service in Sections 10.700, 10.705,
10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750, 10.755,
10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and further
provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between
expense and equipment in Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710,
10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760,
10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 10.1050
Personal Service ................................................................................................$211,662
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 57,500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................269,162
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,582,414
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,768,834
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................8,351,248
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................10,309

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 48
Personal Service ..................................................................................................166,780
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 559,015
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................725,795
For the Ryan White program, provided the eligible income requirement
is at or below three hundred percent (300%) of the Federal
Poverty Level (FPL)
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,615,117
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................92,837,317
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................700,782
Personal Service ..................................................................................................445,659
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 37,235
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 482,894
Total (Not to exceed 50.50 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$109,992,624
Section 10.755. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For Local Public Health Agency support, provided thirty percent (30%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$320,315
Personal Services ..................................................................................................65,472
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 54,140
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .........................119,612
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ........................................................14,573

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 49
For core public health functions and related expenses
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................9,672,692
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ....................................................................................................... 9,900,000
Total (Not to exceed 3.84 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$20,027,192
Section 10.760. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For supplemental nutrition programs, provided thirty percent (30%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$14,837
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,628,871
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 210,656,937
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143)
(including $30,478 one-time) .......................................................................215,285,808
For a non-profit organization located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, which rescues local food, prepares nutritious meals, and
serves to address the core causes of hunger
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 250,000
Total (Not to exceed 68.45 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$215,550,645
Section 10.765. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For rural health and primary care initiatives, including the Health
Professional Loan Repayment Program (HPLRP), provided
thirty percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between personal
service in Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 50
10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770,
10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and further provided thirty percent
(30%) flexibility is allowed between expense and equipment in
Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740,
10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780,
and 10.790, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ................................................................................................$181,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,508,900
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,689,900
Personal Service ..................................................................................................218,267
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,710,781
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,929,048
Personal Service ..................................................................................................126,920
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 14,450
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................141,370
Expense and Equipment
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276) ...................................................................650,000
Expense and Equipment
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan
Repayment Fund (1565) .....................................................................................158,900
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health – Donated Fund (1658)...................................................1,031,790
For a rural primary care physician grant program, provided qualifying
primary care physicians begin practice in a Missouri county with
fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants after July 1, 2022,
further provided prior to the receipt of a grant award, qualifying
primary care physicians agree to reside and practice as a primary
care physician in said county for a continuous five-year period
and to reimburse any grant award received for a breach of the
requirements of this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................200,000
For medical residency program grants for specialty areas of psychiatry,
pediatrics, internal medicine, family practice, and obstetrics and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 51
gynecology, and for associated costs to support the residency
training programs, including but not limited to, costs of teaching
physician salaries, provided that such grants shall not exceed
$100,000 annually per new residency slot; and further provided
that grants be made available to any provider and setting
accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical
Education (ACGME)
Personal Service ....................................................................................................68,603
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,300,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,368,603
For the development of graduate medical education programs, including
but not limited to costs associated to creating and maintaining a
GME Technical Assistance Center, grants for creation of new
programs and expansion of existing programs in facilities that
take care of underserved and rural communities, and grants for
planning and other exploratory projects that position a facility to
sustain or increase graduate medical education opportunities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,502,000
For graduate medical program grants for specialty areas which provide
specific training for physicians to prevent, diagnose, and manage
substance use disorder/opioid use disorder, and for associated
costs to support technical assistance, new and expanded GME
programs, expansion of residency slots within an existing
program, and funding for planning or other exploratory projects
that position the state to increase graduate medical education
opportunities
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................5,000,000
For the refurbishment of existing administration buildings for the
purpose of creating a 166 physician residency program located in
any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer
than two hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................3,250,000
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Board of Nursing Fund
From Professional and Practical Nursing Student Loan and Nurse Loan

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 52
Repayment Fund (1565) .......................................................................... 100,000
Total (Not to exceed 8.06 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$20,021,611
Section 10.770. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For oral health services and initiatives, provided thirty percent (30%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$99,214
Personal Service ..................................................................................................591,922
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,022,602
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,614,524
Personal Service
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..................................................................................3,687
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health – Donated Fund (1658)......................................................655,000
For the Elks Mobile Dental Clinic
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................600,000
For the Missouri Donated Dental Services Program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 180,000
Total (Not to exceed 9.43 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$4,152,425
Section 10.775. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 53
For minority health initiatives, provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service in Sections 10.700, 10.705,
10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750, 10.755,
10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and further
provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between
expense and equipment in Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710,
10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760,
10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 10.1050
Personal Service ................................................................................................$260,997
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 194,713
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................455,710
Personal Service
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 39,128
Total (Not to exceed 4.48 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$494,838
Section 10.780. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For women’s health and wellness programs and services, provided thirty
percent (30%) flexibility is allowed between personal service in
Sections 10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740,
10.745, 10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780,
and 10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility
is allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ................................................................................................$114,085
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 256,290
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................370,375
Personal Service ..................................................................................................927,696
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,337,082
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................6,264,778
Personal Service ..................................................................................................112,088

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 54
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,563,582
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................4,675,670
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..................................................................................4,916
Expense and Equipment
From Justice for Survivors Telehealth Network Fund (1228) ........................................100,000
For a statewide telehealth network for forensic examinations of victims
of sexual offenses
Personal Service ....................................................................................................53,603
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,159,585
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,213,188
For the development of maternal quality control protocols to standardize
practices at all birth facilities across the state, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within
this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For the establishment of a perinatal health access collaborative to allow
general practitioners in underserved areas to consult with medical
specialists elsewhere in the state, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections within this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,500,000
For the standardization of maternal care provider trainings, including
screening and treating cardiovascular disorders associated with
pregnancy; and the treatment of mental health conditions or
substance use disorders during and after pregnancy, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within
this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For the development and implementation of best practices for postpartum
plans of care, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between subsections within this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 55
For the development for a state Maternal & Child Health Dashboard,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
subsections within this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................350,000
For the Cora Faith Walker Doula Training Program
For pregnancy and postpartum doulas
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For the implementation of a doula registration process, including the
construction and maintenance of a statewide registry of doulas
who are trained and who, during the course of pregnancy
provides physical and emotional support, and further provided
that during labor and childbirth also provides emotional and
informational support to pregnant women
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ............................................100,000
For a not-for-profit located in a city with more than one hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants to
provide pregnancy and postpartum doula services, further
provided that the Department of Health and Senior Services shall
study the feasibility of and provide recommendations to the
General Assembly on the establishment of a statewide program
for the provision of pregnancy and postpartum doula services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................225,000
For free health clinics located in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
provide prenatal care, for the purpose of providing such care
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................250,000
For contracts for Sexual Violence Victims Services, Awareness, and
Education Program
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,287,134
For family planning and family planning-related services, pregnancy
testing, sexually transmitted disease testing and treatment,
including pap tests and pelvic exams, and follow-up services,
provided that none of the funds appropriated herein may be paid,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 56
granted to, or expended to directly or indirectly fund procedures
or administrative functions of any clinic, physician's office, or
any other place or facility in which abortions are performed or
induced other than a hospital, or any affiliate of any such clinic,
physician's office, or place or facility in which abortions are
performed or induced other than a hospital, or for performing,
inducing, or assisting in the performance or inducing of an
abortion which is not necessary to save the life of the mother, for
encouraging a patient to have an abortion or referring a patient
for an abortion which is not necessary to save the life of the
mother, or developing or dispensing drugs, chemicals, or devices
intended to be used to induce an abortion which is not necessary
to save the life of the mother. Such services shall be available to
uninsured women who are at least eighteen (18) to fifty-five (55)
100 years of age with a family Modified Adjusted Gross Income for
101 the household size that does not exceed two hundred and one
102 percent (201%) of the Federal Poverty Level (FPL) and who is a
103 legal resident of the state
104 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,634,119
105 Total (Not to exceed 17.51 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$21,975,180
Section 10.785. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For fetal infant mortality review services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ........................................................................$1,831,926
Section 10.790. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For vital records certification and issuance, provided thirty percent
(30%) flexibility is allowed between personal service in Sections
10.700, 10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745,
10.750, 10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and
10.790, and further provided thirty percent (30%) flexibility is
allowed between expense and equipment in Sections 10.700,
10.705, 10.710, 10.725, 10.730, 10.735, 10.740, 10.745, 10.750,
10.755, 10.760, 10.765, 10.770, 10.775, 10.780, and 10.790, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,651,943

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 57
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 70,900
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,722,843
Personal Service ..................................................................................................142,709
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 787,754
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .........................930,463
Personal Service ..................................................................................................130,693
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 25,724
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ......................................................156,417
Personal Service ..................................................................................................110,956
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,748
From Putative Father Registry Fund (1780) ...................................................................138,704
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................11,371
For the finalization of updates to the Department of Health and Senior
Services Vital Records System, including necessary
infrastructure, security enhancements, and staff training
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ...................................................1,763,000
For an organization located in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
provides health education and accelerates emerging technology
and opportunities in healthcare innovation
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................700,000
For coroner trainings provided by the Missouri Coroners' and Medical
Examiners' Association
From Missouri State Coroner’s Training Fund (1846) ........................................ 355,482
Total (Not to exceed 28.40 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,778,280
Section 10.795. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
To address coronavirus preparedness and response, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this section
Personal Service ....................................................................................................$1,585

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 58
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,377,167
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus
Fund (2350) ......................................................................................................2,378,752
Personal Service ....................................................................................................37,712
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,005,371
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus - 2021
Fund (2457) ......................................................................................................1,043,083
To provide coronavirus mitigation efforts, including, but not
limited to, testing, tracing, reporting, and related expenses,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this section
Personal Service ...............................................................................................9,402,192
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 189,090,340
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus Fund
(2350) ...........................................................................................................198,492,532
For Epidemiology Laboratory Capacity – Advanced Molecular
Detection – Public Health Lab Preparedness, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in this section
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus - 2021
Fund (2457) ......................................................................................................4,634,965
For public health workforce development, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
grant programs in this section
Personal Service ..................................................................................................242,367
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,983,085
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus - 2021
Fund (2457) ....................................................................................................18,225,452
For Strengthening Healthcare Associated Infections and Antibiotic
Resistance Program Capacity, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
grant programs in this section
Personal Service ..................................................................................................860,359
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,685,803
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus - 2021

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 59
Fund (2457) ......................................................................................................4,546,162
To provide COVID-19 mitigation and prevention efforts,
including, but not limited to, testing, vaccinations, reporting, and
public health workforce enhancement, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between American Rescue Plan Act
of 2021 grant programs in this section
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,816,452
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 43,433,359
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus - 2021
Fund (2457) ....................................................................................................45,249,811
For the Disease Intervention Specialist Program to prevent the spread of
COVID-19 and other infectious diseases among vulnerable
communities, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 grant programs in
this section
Personal Service ..................................................................................................156,673
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,697,407
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus - 2021
Fund (2457) ......................................................................................................3,854,080
For immunization information systems, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
grant programs in this section
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus - 2021
Fund (2457) .............................................................................................. 999,317
Total (Not to exceed 50.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$279,424,154
Section 10.800. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the State Public Health Laboratory, including providing newborn
screening services on weekends and holidays, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.1050
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,878,826
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 870,120
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,748,946
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,262,010

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 60
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,298,268
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................3,560,278
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,077,479
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,494,336
From Missouri Public Health Services Fund (1298) ...................................................8,571,815
Personal Service ..................................................................................................134,588
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 473,684
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................608,272
Personal Service ....................................................................................................56,057
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 414
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................................56,471
Personal Service ..................................................................................................468,515
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,968,131
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .........................2,436,646
Expense and Equipment
From Childhood Lead Testing Fund (1899) ........................................................ 65,017
Total (Not to exceed 113.51 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$19,047,445
Section 10.900. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$15,393,767
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,333,490
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................16,727,257
Personal Service .............................................................................................16,491,266
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,621,325
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................18,112,591
For Medicaid Home and Community-Based Services Program
reassessments, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ..................................................................................................943,724
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 866,186

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 61
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,809,910
Personal Service ..................................................................................................943,723
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 866,186
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,809,909
Expense and Equipment
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 31,150
Total (Not to exceed 625.69 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$38,490,817
Section 10.905. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For non-Medicaid reimbursable senior and disability programs, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 10.1050
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$705,145
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,924,500
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus - 2021
Fund (2457) .........................................................................................................701,909
For a customized statewide education, peer support and coaching
platform to be used to address the needs of family caregivers who
are supporting conditions associated with, but not limited to,
aging, Alzheimer’s, and dementia, intellectual and
developmental disabilities, and pediatric care, the platform shall
use evidence based outcomes that; delay placements in long-term
facilities, reduce emergency department visits, and decrease
burnout of caregivers
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................949,000
For special health care needs programs, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.1050
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,834,778
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................1,145,238
From Children’s Special Health Care Needs Service Fund (1950) ..................................30,000
From Brain Injury Fund (1742) ......................................................................................974,900
From C & M Smith Memorial Endowment Trust Fund (1873) ........................... 10,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,275,470

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 62
Section 10.910. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For providing consumer directed personal care assistance services at a
rate not to exceed sixty percent (60%) of the average monthly
Medicaid cost of nursing facility care, including payments to
providers for value-based payment initiatives, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and
Section 10.915 to allow flexibility within the Medicaid Home and
Community Based Services Program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$255,754,909
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 440,209,856
Total .......................................................................................................................$695,964,765
Section 10.915. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For respite care, homemaker chore, personal care, assistive technology,
adult day care, AIDS, children's waiver services, home-delivered
meals, Programs of All Inclusive Care for the Elderly, the
Structured Family Caregiver Waiver, Brain Injury Waiver, other
related services, and program management under the Medicaid
fee-for-service and managed care programs, including payments
to providers for value-based payment initiatives. Provided that
individuals eligible for or receiving nursing home care must be
given the opportunity to have those Medicaid dollars follow them
to the community to the extent necessary to meet their unmet
needs as determined by 19 CSR 30 81.030 and further be allowed
to choose the personal care program option, including the option
of assistive technology, in the community that best meets the
individuals' unmet needs, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between this section and Section 10.910 to allow
flexibility within the Medicaid Home and Community Based
Services Program, and further provided that individuals eligible
for the Medicaid Personal Care Option must be allowed to
choose, from among all the program options, that option which
best meets their unmet needs as determined by 19 CSR 30
81.030; and also be allowed to have their Medicaid funds follow
them to the extent necessary to meet their unmet needs whichever

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 63
option they choose. This language does not create any
entitlements not established by statute
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$239,571,579
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 372,590,645
Total .......................................................................................................................$612,162,224
Section 10.916. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For the purposes of funding a family complex care assistant program
under which a parent, guardian, family member, and any other
individual with a close association that is the equivalent of a
family relationship of an enrollee in Medicaid approved by the
enrollee's parent or guardian may be employed by a private duty
nursing agency as a Complex Care Assistant (CCA) and, under
the direction of a Registered Nurse, to provide CCA services to
the enrollee
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,800,000
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 7,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,000,000
Section 10.920. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Senior
Services Growth and Development Program Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,618,433
Section 10.925. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For Home and Community Services grants to be distributed to the Area
Agencies on Aging, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between these services and meal services, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.1050
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,074,704
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143)
(including $2,000,000 one-time) ....................................................................39,244,641

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 64
For distributions to the Area Agencies on Aging, in accordance with
Section 192.385, RSMo, which requires the deposit of a portion
of the premium tax collected under Sections 148.320 and
148.370, RSMo, to the Senior Services Growth and Development
Program Fund
From Senior Services Growth and Development Program Fund (1419) ...................21,530,621
For statewide implementation of the Give 5 program in partnership with
the Missouri Association of Area Agencies on Aging
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For meals to be distributed to each Area Agency on Aging, provided that
at least $500,000 of general revenue be used for non-Medicaid
meals to be distributed to each Area Agency on Aging in
proportion to the actual number of meals served during the
preceding fiscal year, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between these services and grant services, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.1050
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................9,731,016
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................6,955,359
From Elderly Home-Delivered Meals Trust Fund (1296) ................................................62,958
For the Ombudsman Program operated by the Area Agencies on Aging
or their service providers
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................150,000
Personal Service ....................................................................................................25,250
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 31,116
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2457) ..................................................................................... 56,366
Total .........................................................................................................................$80,805,665
Section 10.930. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For Alzheimer’s program grants to be used by organizations serving
individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and their caregivers as well

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 65
as providing statewide respite assistance and support programs to
Missouri families to ease burden, enhance quality of life, and
reduce the number of persons with Alzheimer’s disease who are
prematurely or unnecessarily institutionalized, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.1050
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,550,000
For caregiver training programs which include in-home visits that delay
the institutionalization of persons with dementia
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 650,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,200,000
Section 10.935. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For senior independent living programs that support seniors aging in
place in communities with a high concentration of older adults,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 10.1050
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$400,000
Section 10.936. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For a nonprofit organization located in a city with more than one hundred
twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand
inhabitants that provides quality affordable housing opportunities
with supportive and economic resources to eligible households,
including the elderly, disabled citizens, and veterans
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$120,000
Section 10.940. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For providing naturalization assistance to refugees and/or legal
immigrants who: have resided in Missouri more than five years,
are unable to benefit or attend classroom instruction, and who
require special assistance to successfully attain the requirements
to become a citizen. Services may include direct tutoring,
assistance with identifying and completing appropriate waiver
requests to the Immigration and Customs Enforcement agency,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 66
and facilitating proper documentation. The department shall
award a contract under this section to a qualified not-for-profit
organization which can demonstrate its ability to work with this
population. A report shall be compiled for the General Assembly
evaluating the program’s effectiveness in helping senior refugees
and immigrants in establishing citizenship and their ability to
qualify individuals for Medicare
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 10.1000. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
For program operations and support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 10.1050
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$13,879,494
Expense and Equipment (including $100,000 one-time) ......................... 2,117,707
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................15,997,201
Personal Service .............................................................................................13,989,032
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,423,811
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ....................15,412,843
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,422,531
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 286,589
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ...................................................1,709,120
Personal Service ....................................................................................................87,497
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,121
From Mammography Fund (1293) .................................................................................100,618
For nursing home quality initiatives
Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ...................................725,000
For the Time Critical Diagnosis Unit
Personal Service ..................................................................................................464,203
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 356,857
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................821,060
For the Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs operations and
support

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 67
Personal Service ..................................................................................................319,392
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,716
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................324,108
Personal Service ..................................................................................................100,580
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,192
From Health Access Incentive Fund (1276) ...................................................................111,772
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) (one-time) ................1,700,000
For activities and equipment that further promote Cardiac Emergency
Plan preparedness, but not limited to the purchase of AEDs and
AED maintenance, the purchase of CPR training kits or CPR
training of faculty and staff, basic first aid training and
educational materials
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ......................................................................2,000,000
For the Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs for a Physician
Prescription Monitoring Program
Personal Service ..................................................................................................290,616
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 137,116
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................427,732
For expending Civil Monetary Penalty funding on federally approved
nursing facility activities and projects
Expense and Equipment
From Nursing Facility Quality Care Fund (1271) ............................................... 5,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 394.03 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$44,329,454
Section 10.1005. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
The Quality Improvement Program for Missouri (QIPMO) to
provide technical assistance to nursing homes, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
10.1050
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$325,000
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ........................ 1,134,926
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,459,926

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 68
Section 10.1010. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Cannabis Regulation
For adult use cannabis program operations and support, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$9,225,052
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,568,740
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .......................14,793,792
For grants to agencies and not-for-profit organizations, whether
government or community-based, to increase access to evidence-
based low-barrier drug addiction treatment, prioritizing
medically proven treatment and overdose prevention and reversal
methods and public or private treatment options with an emphasis
on reintegrating recipients into their local communities; to
support overdose prevention education; and to support job
placement, housing, and counseling for those with substance use
disorders. When evaluating grant applications, agencies and
organizations serving populations with the highest rates of drug-
related overdose shall be prioritized to receive the grants
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) ...................................................................15,918,179
For medical marijuana program operations and support, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,456,934
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,381,547
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) .............................................8,838,481
For the Medical Marijuana Opportunities program to provide support to
facilitate the inclusion of individuals in Missouri’s medical
marijuana industry who have been negatively and
disproportionately impacted by marijuana criminalization and
poverty
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) ..................................... 200,000
Total (Not to exceed 156.50 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$39,750,452
Section 10.1015. To the Department of Health and Senior Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 69
For grants to the Department of Mental Health
For youth substance use prevention
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) ......................................................................$300,000
For mental health community and youth services liaisons
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) .....................................................................1,825,325
For peer respite services
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) .....................................................................2,000,000
For alcohol abuse prevention
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) .....................................................................1,000,000
For Recovery Support Services and Recovery Community Centers
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) .....................................................................6,000,000
For substance use disorder treatment providers
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) .....................................................................3,225,000
For funding for an organization, located in a city with more than one
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, that works with individuals who struggle with
substance use and live with other mental health issues through
community service, awareness and education events
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) (one-time) ......................................................250,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ......................... 675,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,275,325
Section 10.1020. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a grant to the Supreme Court
For funding treatment court programs, provided that funds may be used
for, but are not limited to, medication assisted treatment,
counseling, transportation, and drug testing for Missourians with
substance use, mental health, or co-occurring disorders,
including, but not limited to, alcohol, opioid, and
methamphetamine addiction, pursuant to agreements between the
Treatment Courts Coordinating Commission and adult treatment
courts, DWI courts, veterans courts, mental health courts, and
other treatment courts of this state
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) ......................................................................$500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 70
Section 10.1025. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a grant for the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For drug abuse resistance education materials and programming for
school drug awareness including marijuana initiatives for youth
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) ......................................................................$350,000
Section 10.1030. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for health
and care services for military veterans as provided by Article
XIV, Section 1 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Missouri
Veterans' Homes Fund, and further provided that any monies
remaining in the fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) .........................................$13,000,000
Section 10.1035. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for health
and care services for military veterans as provided by Article
XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Veterans
Reinvestment Fund, provided the state treasurer shall invest
monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested, and any interest and monies earned on such investments
shall be deposited to the credit of the Veterans Reinvestment
Fund, and further provided that any monies remaining in the
Veterans Reinvestment Fund at the end of a biennium shall not
revert to the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .....................$19,629,271
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for substance
abuse disorder treatment and education programs as provided by
Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Health
Reinvestment Fund, provided the state treasurer shall invest
monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested, and any interest and monies earned on such investments
shall be deposited to the credit of the Health Reinvestment Fund,
and further provided that any monies remaining in the Health
Reinvestment Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .......................19,629,271

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 71
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for public
defenders as provided by Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri
Constitution, to Public Defender Reinvestment Fund, provided
the state treasurer shall invest monies in the fund in the same
manner as other funds are invested, and any interest and monies
earned on such investments shall be deposited to the credit of the
Public Defender Reinvestment Fund, and further provided that
any monies remaining in the Public Defender Reinvestment Fund
at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
General Revenue Fund
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ................. 19,629,271
Total .........................................................................................................................$58,887,813
Section 10.1050. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 10.2005. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 10.105, 10.115, and 10.130 of Part 1 of
this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, with the
exception of Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics, for
which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of a Medicare
Economic Index rate increase of 2.5% greater than the rate in
effect on January 1, 2025, with the exception of revenue
maximization initiatives, and further excepting rates of cost-
based and actuarially sound rate changes for Comprehensive
Substance Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR) and
Compulsive Gambling; and further excepting providers of
children’s residential services classified as an Institution of
Mental Disease (IMD) Qualified Residential Treatment Program
(QRTP) or as a non-IMD QRTP, for which no funds shall be
expended in furtherance of rates greater than: $194.47 per day for

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 72
Level II, $239.16 per day for Level III, $253.80 per day for Level
IV.
Section 10.2010. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 10.109 and 10.110 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, with the
exception of Recovery Support Services, for which no funds shall
be expended in furtherance of rates greater than: $34.46 for
Individual Counseling, $44.57 for Recovery Housing, $12.60 for
Care Coordination, $22.15 for Peer Support, and $4.08 for Group
Rehabilitative Support.
Section 10.2015. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Section 10.410 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of waiver slots
assigned on July 1, 2025, except for: 400 additional waiver slots
for Crisis Residential Services, 54 additional slots for individuals
transitioning from Nursing Homes, 48 additional slots for
children transitioning from DSS Children's Division funded
waiver slots, 500 additional waiver slots for the Community
Support Waiver for prevention of in-home wait list, 200
additional waiver slots for Partnership for Hope services, and 83
additional waiver slots for children transitioning out of the
MoCDD Waiver.
Section 10.2020. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Section 10.415 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of a DD Health Home
rate of $105.90 PMPM.
Section 10.2025. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to Sections 10.905, 10.910, and 10.915 of Part 1 of
this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, except Private
Duty Nursing rates for which no funds shall be expended in
furtherance of provider rates for Private Duty Nursing greater
than a rate of $15.20 per fifteen-minute unit of service, and
further excepting provider reassessment services rates, for which

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 73
no funds shall be expended in furtherance of rates greater than
$100 per assessment, unless such provider is enrolled in the
Value Based Purchasing Reassessment Program, and further
excepting the Medicaid Home-Delivered Meals rate for which no
funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates for
Medicaid Home-Delivered Meals greater than $7.14 per meal.
Section 10.2035. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to Section 10.1000 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended for Certified Nursing Assistant
(CNA) training reimbursement greater than $1,500 per enrollee.
PART 3
Section 10.3005. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 10.005 through and including 10.575 in
of Part 1 of this act:
The Department shall provide monthly reports to the House
Budget and Senate Appropriations Committee Chairs for each
DMH Medicaid waiver, large service type by waiver, and
targeted case management costs: 1) The actual federal and state
share expenditures by appropriation and fund, number of waiver
slots assigned, average cost per slot, estimated current fiscal year
costs, estimated full fiscal year costs; 2) The actual federal and
state share expenditures by appropriation and fund, number of
new waiver slots assigned in FY 2026, average cost per slot,
estimated current fiscal year costs, estimated full fiscal year
costs; and 3) The number of individuals presenting for service
that have not been assigned a waiver slot, estimated current fiscal
year federal and state share costs if they were to be assigned,
estimated full fiscal year costs if they were to be assigned.
Section 10.3010. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Departments shall provide written notification and
correspondence from the federal government of non-compliance
with federal programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 10 74
Section 10.3015. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in of Part 1 of this act:
The Departments shall provide written documentation of rate
setting reports, rate studies, time surveys, time studies, and
random moment time studies; and the federal and state share
fiscal impact estimates, to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 10.3020. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide copies of financial reports,
maintenance of effort reports, and public assistance cost
allocation plans submitted to the federal government and
supporting cash on hand reports, by grant, to the House Budget
and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Department of Mental Health Totals
General Revenue Fund (4,951.82 F.T.E.) ...........................................................$1,780,195,793
Federal Funds (2,258.13 F.T.E.) ...........................................................................2,580,216,757
Other Funds (21.50 F.T.E.) .................................................................................. 95,742,026
Total (7,231.45 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$4,456,154,576
Department of Health and Senior Services Totals
General Revenue Fund (659.93 F.T.E.) .................................................................$631,632,329
Federal Funds (1,004.31 F.T.E.) ...........................................................................1,597,608,484
Other Funds (319.01 F.T.E.) ............................................................................... 117,878,124
Total (1,983.25 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$2,347,118,937
